Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.412

Auditing services revolving account—Transfers and payments into account—Allotments to state auditor.

The amounts to be disbursed from the auditing services revolving account shall be paid from funds appropriated to any and all state agencies for auditing services or administrative expenses. State agencies operating in whole or in part from nonappropriated funds shall pay into the auditing services revolving account such funds as will fully reimburse funds appropriated to the state auditor for auditing services provided.

The director of financial management shall allot all such funds to the state auditor for the operation of his or her office, pursuant to appropriation, in the same manner as appropriated funds are allocated to other state agencies headed by elected officers under chapter 43.88 RCW.

[ 1995 c 301 s 26; 1987 c 165 s 1; 1981 c 336 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 336: See note following RCW 43.09.410.